Maryland, session 2025, HB0599.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
3–501.
(a) (1) The following individuals or entities shall designate one or more
representatives to participate as a party in collective bargaining on behalf of the State or
the following institutions:
(i) on behalf of the State, the Governor;
(ii) on behalf of the Maryland Environmental Service, the Board of
Directors of the Service;
(iii) on behalf of the University System of Maryland, the Chancellor;
and
(iv) on behalf of Morgan State University, St. Mary’s College of
Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College, the governing board of the institution.
(2) The exclusive representative shall designate one or more
representatives to participate as a party in collective bargaining on behalf of the exclusive
representative.
(b) The parties shall meet at reasonable times and engage in collective bargaining
in good faith, including facilitating the meaningful use of a fact finder under subsection
(c)(3) of this section, and to conclude a written memorandum of understanding or other
written understanding as defined under § 3–101(d)(1)(i)2 of this title.
(c) (1) The parties shall make every reasonable effort to conclude negotiations
in a timely manner for inclusion by the principal unit in its budget request to the Governor.
(2) (i) The parties shall conclude negotiations before January 1 for any
item requiring an appropriation of funds for the fiscal year that begins on the following
July 1.
(ii) In the budget bill submitted to the General Assembly, the
Governor shall include any amounts in the budgets of the principal units required to

HOUSE BILL 599 3
accommodate any additional cost resulting from the negotiations, including the actuarial
impact of any legislative changes to any of the State pension or retirement systems that
are required, as a result of the negotiations, for the fiscal year beginning the following July
1 if the legislative changes have been negotiated to become effective in that fiscal year.
(3) (i) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO NEGOTIATIONS
BETWEEN THE STATE AND THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE UNIFORMED
FIRE EMPLOYEES OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT.
(II) If the parties do not conclude negotiations for the next fiscal year
before October 25, either party may request that a fact finder be employed to resolve the
issues.
[(ii)] (III) The fact finder shall be employed no later than November
1.
[(iii)] (IV) A fact finder shall be a neutral party appointed by
alternate striking from a list by the parties provided:
1. by the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service; or
2. under the Labor Arbitration Rules of the American
Arbitration Association.
[(iv)] (V) The fact finder:
1. may give notice and hold hearings in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act;
2. may administer oaths and take testimony and other
evidence;
3. may issue subpoenas; and
4. before November 20, shall make written recommendations
regarding wages, hours, and working conditions, and any other terms or conditions of
employment that may be in dispute.
[(v)] (VI) The written recommendations of the fact finder shall be
delivered to the Governor, the exclusive representative, the President of the Senate, and
the Speaker of the House of Delegates by the Secretary on or before December 1.
(4) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO NEGOTIATIONS
BETWEEN THE STATE AND THE EXCLUSIVE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE UNIFORMED
FIRE EMPLOYEES OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 599
(II) THE PARTIES SHALL REACH AN AGREEMENT BY
SEPTEMBER 30 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT
WILL EXPIRE.
(III) AN IMPASSE IS REACHED DURING THE NEGOTIATIONS IF
THE PARTIES DO NOT REACH AN AGREEMENT:
1. BY STATING THAT THEY MUTUALLY AGREE THEY ARE
AT AN IMPASSE; OR
2. ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1 OF THE YEAR IN WHICH A
COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT WILL EXPIRE.
(IV) IF AN IMPASSE IS REACHED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, EACH PARTY SHALL SUBMIT ITS LAST, BEST, AND FINAL OFFER
TO THE OTHER PARTY WITHIN 48 HOURS AFTER THE IMPASSE IS REACHED.
(V) 1. UNLESS THE IMPASSE HAS BEEN RESOLVED, THE
PARTIES SHALL MEET WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS AFTER THE IMPASSE IS REACHED
UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO SELECT AN ARBITRATOR
FROM A LIST OF 15 ARBITRATORS PROVIDED BY THE AMERICAN ARBITRATION
ASSOCIATION’S LABOR ARBITRATION PANEL.
2. THE PARTIES SHALL SELECT THE ARBITRATOR BY
ALTERNATELY STRIKING A NAME FROM THE LIST UNTIL ONE NAME REMAINS.
3. IF THE SELECTED ARBITRATOR IS UNABLE TO
FULFILL THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE ARBITRATION, THE SELECTION PROCESS
SHALL BE REPEATED USING A NEW LIST OF ARBITRATORS UNTIL AN ARBITRATOR IS
SELECTED.
4. THE PARTIES SHALL SUBMIT THE DISPUTE AND THE
LAST, BEST, AND FINAL OFFERS TO THE ARBITRATOR WITHIN 5 BUSINESS DAYS
AFTER THE ARBITRATOR IS SELECTED.
(VI) 1. THE ARBITRATOR SHALL HOLD FORMAL HEARINGS AS
NECESSARY IN ORDER TO RESOLVE THE IMPASSE.
2. DURING THE FIRST 21 DAYS IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING THE APPOINTMENT OF THE ARBITRATOR AND BEFORE HOLDING ANY
FORMAL HEARINGS, THE ARBITRATOR MAY, IF DETERMINED APPROPRIATE BY THE
ARBITRATOR, ATTEMPT TO RESOLVE THE IMPASSE BY ACTING AS A NEUTRAL
MEDIATOR BETWEEN THE PARTIES.

HOUSE BILL 599 5
(VII) THE ARBITRATOR SHALL SELECT ONE PARTY’S LAST, BEST,
AND FINAL OFFER ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 15.
(VIII) 1. THE SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE DECISION OF THE ARBITRATOR IS BINDING ON THE PARTIES.
2. A DECISION OF AN ARBITRATOR UNDER THIS
PARAGRAPH RELATED TO WAGES IS SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THE STATE
BUDGET.
(IX) THE PARTIES SHALL EQUALLY SHARE THE COSTS OF THE
SERVICES OF THE ARBITRATOR.
(d) (1) A memorandum of understanding that incorporates all matters of
agreement reached by the parties shall be executed by the exclusive representative and:
(i) for a memorandum of understanding relating to the State, the
Governor or the Governor’s designee;
(ii) for a memorandum of understanding relating to the Maryland
Environmental Service, the Board of Directors of the Service;
(iii) for a memorandum of understanding relating to a system
institution, the Chancellor or the Chancellor’s designee; and
(iv) for a memorandum of understanding relating to Morgan State
University, St. Mary’s College of Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College, the
governing board of the institution or the governing board’s designee.
(2) To the extent these matters require legislative approval or the
appropriation of funds, the matters shall be recommended to the General Assembly for
approval or for the appropriation of funds.
(3) To the extent matters involving a State institution of higher education
require legislative approval, the legislation shall be recommended to the Governor for
submission to the General Assembly.
(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, negotiations for
a memorandum of understanding shall be considered closed sessions under § 3–305 of the
General Provisions Article.
(2) An exclusive representative may not be considered a public body under
§ 3–101 of the General Provisions Article.
(f) (1) The terms of a memorandum of understanding executed by the
Governor or the Governor’s designee and an exclusive representative of a bargaining unit

HOUSE BILL 599
for skilled service or professional service employees in the State Personnel Management
System are not applicable to employees of a State institution of higher education.
(2) The terms of a memorandum of understanding executed by the
Chancellor or the governing board of Morgan State University, St. Mary’s College of
Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College, or their respective designees, and the
exclusive representative of a bargaining unit for employees of a State institution of higher
education are not applicable to skilled service or professional service employees in the State
Personnel Management System.
3–603.
(a) A memorandum of understanding agreed to and ratified under § 3–601 of this
subtitle may not expire until it is succeeded by a memorandum of understanding that is
agreed to and ratified OR ADOPTED BY ARBITRATION under this title.
(b) Notwithstanding § 3–601(b) of this subtitle, all terms of a memorandum of
understanding shall continue in force and effect without change until a successor
memorandum of understanding is agreed to and ratified.
(c) (1) Based on a verified complaint by an exclusive representative, the
exclusive representative may file an action in a circuit court against the State, the
Maryland Environmental Service, a system institution, Morgan State University, St.
Mary’s College of Maryland, or Baltimore City Community College to enforce the terms of
this section.
(2) On receipt of an action submitted by the exclusive representative, the
court shall issue a status quo order without a finding of irreparable harm to maintain a
memorandum of understanding and the terms in effect pending a final order in the action.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, (Three–fifths of all the members
elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be proposed that the Maryland
Constitution read as follows:
Article III – Legislative Department
52.
(1) The General Assembly shall not appropriate any money out of the
Treasury except in accordance with the provisions of this section.
(2) Every appropriation bill shall be either a Budget Bill, or a
Supplementary Appropriation Bill, as hereinafter provided.
(3) On the third Wednesday in January in each year, (except in the case of
a newly elected Governor, and then not later than ten days after the convening of the
General Assembly), unless such time shall be extended by the General Assembly, the

HOUSE BILL 599 7
Governor shall submit to the General Assembly a Budget for the next ensuing fiscal year.
Each Budget shall contain a complete plan of proposed expenditures and estimated
revenues for said fiscal year and shall show the estimated surplus or deficit of revenues at
the end of the preceding fiscal year. EACH BUDGET SHALL ALSO CONTAIN THE
APPROPRIATIONS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT ALL TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF
EMPLOYMENT IN EACH MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING CONCLUDED WITH THE
STATE, WHETHER REACHED THROUGH MUTUAL AGREEMENT OR ARBITRATION
THAT IS BINDING ON THE PARTIES, AND THE GOVERNOR FOR THE NEXT ENSUING
FISCAL YEAR FOR THE UNIFORMED FIRE EMPLOYEES OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE
AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT. Accompanying each Budget shall be a statement showing:
(a) the revenues and expenditures for the preceding fiscal year; (b) the current assets,
liabilities, reserves and surplus or deficit of the State; (c) the debts and funds of the State;
(d) an estimate of the State’s financial condition as of the beginning and end of the
preceding fiscal year; (e) CHANGES IN WAGES, HOURS, FRINGE BENEFITS, HEALTH
BENEFITS, AND OTHER TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT FOR UNIFORMED
FIRE EMPLOYEES OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT
INCLUDED IN EACH MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING COVERING THE FIRE
EMPLOYEES FOR THE NEXT ENSUING FISCAL YEAR; AND (F) any explanation the
Governor may desire to make as to the important features of the Budget and any
suggestions as to methods for reduction or increase of the State’s revenue.
(4) Each Budget shall embrace an estimate of all appropriations in such
form and detail as the Governor shall determine or as may be prescribed by law, as follows:
(a) for the General Assembly as certified to the Governor in the manner hereinafter
provided; (b) for the Executive Department; (c) for the Judiciary Department, as provided
by law, as certified to the Governor; (d) to pay and discharge the principal and interest of
the debt of the State in conformity with Section 34 of Article III of the Constitution, and all
laws enacted in pursuance thereof; (e) for the salaries AND, FOR THE UNIFORMED FIRE
EMPLOYEES OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT, FRINGE
BENEFITS payable by the State and under the Constitution and laws of the State,
INCLUDING THOSE SALARIES AND BENEFITS COMMITTED UNDER EACH
MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING COVERING THE UNIFORMED FIRE EMPLOYEES
OF THE BWI AIRPORT FIRE AND RESCUE DEPARTMENT; (f) for the establishment and
maintenance throughout the State of a thorough and efficient system of public schools in
conformity with Article 8 of the Constitution and with the laws of the State; and (g) for such
other purposes as are set forth in the Constitution or laws of the State.
(5) The Governor shall deliver to the presiding officer of each House the
Budget and a bill for all the proposed appropriations of the Budget classified and in such
form and detail as the Governor shall determine or as may be prescribed by law; and the
presiding officer of each House shall promptly cause said bill to be introduced therein, and
such bill shall be known as the “Budget Bill.” The Governor may, with the consent of the
General Assembly, before final action thereon by the General Assembly, amend or
supplement said Budget to correct an oversight, provide funds contingent on passage of
pending legislation or, in case of an emergency, by delivering such an amendment or

HOUSE BILL 599
supplement to the presiding officers of both Houses; and such amendment or supplement
shall thereby become a part of said Budget Bill as an addition to the items of said bill or as
a modification of or a substitute for any item of said bill such amendment or supplement
may affect.
(5a) The Budget and the Budget Bill as submitted by the Governor to the
General Assembly shall have a figure for the total of all proposed appropriations and a
figure for the total of all estimated revenues available to pay the appropriations, and the
figure for total proposed appropriations shall not exceed the figure for total estimated
revenues. Neither the Governor in submitting an amendment or supplement to the Budget
Bill nor the General Assembly in amending the Budget Bill shall thereby cause the figure
for total proposed appropriations to exceed the figure for total estimated revenues,
including any revisions, and in the Budget Bill as enacted the figure for total estimated
revenues always shall be equal to or exceed the figure for total appropriations.
(6) The General Assembly shall not amend the Budget Bill so as to affect
either the obligations of the State under Section 34 of Article III of the Constitution, or the
provisions made by the laws of the State for the establishment and maintenance of a system
of public schools or the payment of any salaries required to be paid by the State of Maryland
by the Constitution.
(6a) In enacting a balanced Budget Bill each fiscal year as required under
this Section, the General Assembly may amend the bill by increasing or diminishing the
items therein relating to the General Assembly, and by increasing or diminishing the items
therein relating to the judiciary, but except as hereinbefore specified, may not alter the bill
except to strike out or reduce items therein, provided, however, that the salary or
compensation of any public officer may not be decreased during the public officer’s term of
office. When passed by both Houses, the Budget Bill shall be presented to the Governor for
approval or disapproval according to Section 17 of Article II of this Constitution.
(6b) In enacting a balanced Budget Bill as required under this Section for
fiscal year 2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, the General Assembly may amend the bill
by increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the General Assembly, by
increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the judiciary, and by
increasing, diminishing, or adding items therein relating to the Executive Department,
provided that the total of the appropriation for the Executive Department approved by the
General Assembly does not exceed the total proposed appropriation for the Executive
Department submitted by the Governor. The salary or compensation of any public officer
may not be decreased during the public officer’s term of office. When passed by both Houses,
the Budget Bill shall be a law immediately without further action by the Governor.
(7) The Governor and such representatives of the executive departments,
boards, officers and commissions of the State expending or applying for State’s moneys, as
have been designated by the Governor for this purpose, shall have the right, and when
requested by either House of the General Assembly, it shall be their duty to appear and be
heard with respect to any Budget Bill during the consideration thereof, and to answer
inquiries relative thereto.

HOUSE BILL 599 9
(8) Supplementary Appropriation Bill. Either House may consider other
appropriations but both Houses shall not finally act upon such appropriations until after
the Budget Bill has been finally acted upon by both Houses, and no such other
appropriation shall be valid except in accordance with the provisions following: (a) Every
such appropriation shall be embodied in a separate bill limited to some single work, object
or purpose therein stated and called herein a Supplementary Appropriation Bill; (b) Each
Supplementary Appropriation Bill shall provide the revenue necessary to pay the
appropriation thereby made by a tax, direct or indirect, to be levied and collected as shall
be directed in said bill; (c) No Supplementary Appropriation Bill shall become a law unless
it be passed in each House by a vote of a majority of the whole number of the members
elected, and the yeas and nays recorded on its final passage; (d) Each Supplementary
Appropriation Bill shall be presented to the Governor of the State as provided in Section
17 of Article 2 of the Constitution and thereafter all the provisions of said section shall
apply.
(9) Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the General
Assembly from passing at any time, in accordance with the provisions of Section 28 of
Article 3 of the Constitution and subject to the Governor’s power of approval as provided in
Section 17 of Article 2 of the Constitution, an appropriation bill to provide for the payment
of any obligation of the State within the protection of Section 10 of Article 1 of the
Constitution of the United States.
(10) If the Budget Bill shall not have been finally acted upon by the
Legislature seven days before the expiration of the regular session, the Governor shall issue
a proclamation extending the session for some further period as may, in the Governor’s
judgment, be necessary for the passage of such bill; but no matter other than such bill shall
be considered during such extended session except a provision for the cost thereof.
(11) For the purpose of making up the Budget, the Governor shall require
from the proper State officials (including all executive departments, all executive and
administrative offices, bureaus, boards, commissions and agencies that expend or supervise
the expenditure of, and all institutions applying, for State moneys and appropriations) such
itemized estimates and other information, in such form and at such times as directed by
the Governor. An estimate for a program required to be funded by a law which will be in
effect during the fiscal year covered by the Budget and which was enacted before July 1 of
the fiscal year prior to that date shall provide a level of funding not less than that prescribed
in the law. The estimates for the Legislative Department, certified by the presiding officer
of each House, of the Judiciary, as provided by law, certified by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court of Maryland, and for the public schools, as provided by law, shall be
transmitted to the Governor, in such form and at such times as directed by the Governor,
and shall be included in the Budget without revision.
(12) The Governor may provide for public hearings on all estimates and may
require the attendance at such hearings of representatives of all agencies, and for all
institutions applying for State moneys. After such public hearings the Governor may, in
the Governor’s discretion, revise all estimates except those for the legislative and judiciary

HOUSE BILL 599
departments, and for the public schools, as provided by law, and except that the Governor
may not reduce an estimate for a program below a level of funding prescribed by a law
which will be in effect during the fiscal year covered by the Budget, and which was enacted
before July 1 of the fiscal year prior thereto.
(13) The General Assembly may, from time to time, enact such laws not
inconsistent with this section, as may be necessary and proper to carry out its provisions.
(14) In the event of any inconsistency between any of the provisions of this
Section and any of the other provisions of the Constitution, the provisions of this Section
shall prevail. But nothing herein shall in any manner affect the provisions of Section 34 of
Article 3 of the Constitution or of any laws heretofore or hereafter passed in pursuance
thereof, or be construed as preventing the Governor from calling extraordinary sessions of
the General Assembly, as provided by Section 16 of Article 2, or as preventing the General
Assembly at such extraordinary sessions from considering any emergency appropriation or
appropriations.
(15) If any item of any appropriation bill passed under the provisions of this
Section shall be held invalid upon any ground, such invalidity shall not affect the legality
of the bill or of any other item of such bill or bills.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 2 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ____ – Constitutional Amendment
Providing that each budget shall include expenditures necessary to implement
wages, hours, fringe benefits, health benefits, and other terms and conditions of
employment for State employees concluded in each memorandum of understanding
covering State employees.”.

HOUSE BILL 599 11
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings had in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 2 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 5 of this
Act, Section 1 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.